Utah statutes.
19-6-309.   Emergency provisions.
(1) (a)  If the executive director has reason to believe any hazardous
materials release that occurred after March 18, 1985, is presenting a direct
and immediate threat to public health or the environment, the executive
director may:
(i)  issue an order requiring the owner or operator of the facility to take
abatement action within the time specified in the order; or
(ii)  bring suit on behalf of the state in the district court to require the
owner or operator to take immediate abatement action.
(b)  If the executive director determines the owner or operator cannot be
located or is unwilling or unable to take abatement action, the executive
director may:
(i)  reach an agreement with one or more potentially responsible parties to
take abatement action; or
(ii)  use fund monies to investigate the release and take abatement action.
(2)  The executive director may use monies from the fund created in Section
19-6-307:
(a)  for abatement action even if an adjudicative proceeding or judicial
review challenging an order or a decision to take abatement action is pending;
and
(b)  to investigate a suspected hazardous materials release if he has reason
to believe the release may present a direct and immediate threat to public
health.
(3)  This section takes precedence over any conflicting provision in this
part.
